Utah statutes.
23-21-.5.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "General plan" means a document that a municipality or county adopts that
sets forth general guidelines for proposed future development of the land
within the municipality or county and includes what is commonly referred to as
a "master plan."
(2)  "Management plan" means a document prepared in accordance with this
chapter that describes how one or more tracts of land owned by the Division of
Wildlife Resources are to be used.
(3)  "Regional advisory council" means a council created pursuant to Section
23-14-2.6.
(4)  "Wildlife management area" means:
(a)  a single tract of land owned by the division; or
(b)  two or more tracts of land owned by the division that are within close
proximity of each other and managed as a single unit.
